Hawaii statutes.
§352-1 Definitions. In this chapter,
unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

"Department" means the department of
human services; provided that the powers, duties, and functions relating to the
Hawaii youth correctional facilities shall be administered by the office of
youth services.

"Director" means the executive
director of the office of youth services.

"Discharge" means the ending of the
executive director of the office of youth services' supervision of a person
when the term of the person's commitment has ended or when the director
believes the purpose of the term of commitment has been achieved.

"Furlough" means an authorized
absence of short duration from a youth correctional facility.

"Parole" means the conditional
release of a person committed to a youth correctional facility whereby the
person remains in the custody of the director and under the supervision of the
juvenile parole office.

"Term of commitment" means the time
period during which family court retains jurisdiction over a person after
adjudication. During the term of commitment, the family court may vest custody
of the person in another person, organization, agency, facility, or other
suitable entity. [L 1980, c 303, pt of §8(1); am L 1985, c 209, §4; am L 1986,
c 297, §4; am L 1987, c 338, §§2, 10; am L 1989, c 211, §8; am L 1991, c 114,
§2; am L 2003, c 95, §10(1)]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next